lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_weakGH.txt
!=====================================
LEXICON NounInflIII
!  for noun roots that end in weak -gh
!=====================================

!---------------------------------------|
!              ABSOLUTIVE               |
!---------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|
^[Abs.Sg]:^%{NULL%}          PostInflIII; ^[Abs.Pl]:^%{.w.%}t            PostInflIII; ^[Abs.Du]:^%{.w.%}k             PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|
^[Abs.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}ka PostInflIII; ^[Abs.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}nka  PostInflIII; ^[Abs.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gka   PostInflIII;
^[Abs.1PlPoss.Sg]:^put       PostInflIII; ^[Abs.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}put  PostInflIII; ^[Abs.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gput  PostInflIII;
^[Abs.1DuPoss.Sg]:^pung      PostInflIII; ^[Abs.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}pung PostInflIII; ^[Abs.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpung PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|
^[Abs.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}n  PostInflIII; ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Pl]:^ten         PostInflIII; ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gken  PostInflIII;
                                          ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}ten  PostInflIII;
^[Abs.2PlPoss.Sg]:^si        PostInflIII; ^[Abs.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}si   PostInflIII; ^[Abs.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gsi   PostInflIII;
^[Abs.2DuPoss.Sg]:^tek       PostInflIII; ^[Abs.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}tek  PostInflIII; ^[Abs.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gtek  PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|
^[Abs.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}a  PostInflIII; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}i    PostInflIII; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}kek   PostInflIII;
^[Abs.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}at PostInflIII; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}it   PostInflIII; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gket  PostInflIII;
^[Abs.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}ak PostInflIII; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}ik   PostInflIII; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gkek  PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|
^[Abs.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}ni PostInflIII; ^[Abs.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}ni   PostInflIII; ^[Abs.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gni   PostInflIII;
^[Abs.4PlPoss.Sg]:^teng      PostInflIII; ^[Abs.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}teng PostInflIII; ^[Abs.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gteng PostInflIII;
^[Abs.4DuPoss.Sg]:^tek       PostInflIII; ^[Abs.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}tek  PostInflIII; ^[Abs.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gtek  PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|

!-------------------------------------------|
!       RELATIVE (ergative & genitive)      |
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Rel.Sg]:^%{.w.%}m              PostInflIII; ^[Rel.Pl]:^%{.w.%}t              PostInflIII; ^[Rel.Du]:^%{.w.%}k               PostInflIII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Rel.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}ma     PostInflIII; ^[Rel.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}ma     PostInflIII; ^[Rel.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gma     PostInflIII;
^[Rel.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mta    PostInflIII; ^[Rel.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mta    PostInflIII; ^[Rel.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemta   PostInflIII;
^[Rel.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtung  PostInflIII; ^[Rel.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtung  PostInflIII; ^[Rel.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemtung PostInflIII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Rel.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpek   PostInflIII; ^[Rel.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpek   PostInflIII; ^[Rel.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpek    PostInflIII;
^[Rel.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesi  PostInflIII; ^[Rel.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesi  PostInflIII; ^[Rel.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpesi   PostInflIII;
^[Rel.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetek PostInflIII; ^[Rel.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetek PostInflIII; ^[Rel.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpetek  PostInflIII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Rel.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}an     PostInflIII; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}an     PostInflIII; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gkenka  PostInflIII;
^[Rel.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}ita    PostInflIII; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}ita    PostInflIII; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gkenka  PostInflIII;
^[Rel.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}ita    PostInflIII; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}ita    PostInflIII; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gkenka  PostInflIII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Rel.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}mi     PostInflIII; ^[Rel.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}mi     PostInflIII; ^[Rel.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmi     PostInflIII;
^[Rel.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}meng   PostInflIII; ^[Rel.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}meng   PostInflIII; ^[Rel.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmeng   PostInflIII;
^[Rel.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}meng   PostInflIII; ^[Rel.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}meng   PostInflIII; ^[Rel.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmeng   PostInflIII;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|

!---------------------------------------------------|
!                  ABLATIVE MODALIS                 |
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.Sg]:^%{.w.%}meng               PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.Pl]:^%{.w.%}neng               PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.Du]:^%{.w.%}gneng              PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mneng      PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mneng      PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemneng    PostInflIII;
^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnneng     PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnneng     PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemnneng   PostInflIII;
^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegneng   PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegneng   PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemtegneng PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpeneng    PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpeneng    PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpeneng    PostInflIII;
^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegneng   PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegneng   PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpegneng   PostInflIII;
^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesineng  PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesineng  PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpesineng  PostInflIII;
^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegneng PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegneng PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpetegneng PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}aneng      PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}aneng      PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gkeneng    PostInflIII;
^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}itneng     PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}itneng     PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itneng     PostInflIII;
^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}gkeneng    PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}itneng     PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itneng     PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}mineng     PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}mineng     PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmineng    PostInflIII;
^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}meggneng   PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}meggneng   PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmeggneng  PostInflIII;
^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}megneng    PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}megneng    PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmegneng   PostInflIII;
^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}megteneng  PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}megteneng  PostInflIII; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmegteneng PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------------|

!---------------------------------------------|
!             LOCATIVE (localis)              |
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.Sg]:^%{.w.%}mi               PostInflIII; ^[Loc.Pl]:^%{.w.%}ni               PostInflIII; ^[Loc.Du]:^%{.w.%}gni              PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mni      PostInflIII; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mni      PostInflIII; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemni    PostInflIII;
^[Loc.1PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mnni     PostInflIII; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mnni     PostInflIII; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemnni   PostInflIII;
^[Loc.1DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}mtegni   PostInflIII; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}mtegni   PostInflIII; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gemtegni PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpeni    PostInflIII; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpeni    PostInflIII; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpeni    PostInflIII;
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpegni   PostInflIII; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpegni   PostInflIII; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpegni   PostInflIII;
^[Loc.2PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpesini  PostInflIII; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpesini  PostInflIII; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpesini  PostInflIII;
^[Loc.2DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.m.%}gpetegni PostInflIII; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.m.%}gpetegni PostInflIII; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gpetegni PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}ani      PostInflIII; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}ani      PostInflIII; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gkeni    PostInflIII;
^[Loc.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.c.%}itni     PostInflIII; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}itni     PostInflIII; ^[Loc.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itni     PostInflIII;
^[Loc.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}gkeni    PostInflIII; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.c.%}itni     PostInflIII; ^[Loc.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.c.%}itni     PostInflIII;
!---------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}mini     PostInflIII; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}mini     PostInflIII; ^[Loc.4SgPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmini    PostInflIII;
^[Loc.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}meggni   PostInflIII; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}meggni   PostInflIII; ^[Loc.4PlPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmeggni  PostInflIII;
^[Loc.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.w.%}megni    PostInflIII; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.w.%}megni    PostInflIII; ^[Loc.4DuPoss.Du]:^%{.w.%}gmegni   PostInflIII;
